District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-211.02

Rules; fees; notice.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1102, 34 DCR 6856
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2047, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2029, 57 DCR 6242
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(y), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-499.22.

Section 209 of D.C. Law 18-222 rewrote subsec. (b) to read as follows:

“(b) The Mayor, pursuant to Title 1 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may establish fees and additional charges as necessary for the implementation of this act.”.

Section 2002(b) of D.C. Law 18-222 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2047 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2047 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 209 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 209 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2029 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).